Utah statutes.
25-6-4.   Value -- Transfer.
(1)  Value is given for a transfer or an obligation if, in exchange for the
transfer or obligation, property is transferred or an antecedent debt is
secured or satisfied.  However, value does not include an unperformed promise
made other than in the ordinary course of the promisor's business to furnish
support to the debtor or another person.
(2)  Under Subsection 25-6-5 (1) (b) and Section 25-6-6, a person gives a
reasonably equivalent value if the person acquires an interest of the debtor
in an asset pursuant to a regularly conducted, noncollusive foreclosure sale
or execution of a power of sale for the acquisition or disposition of the
interest of the debtor upon default under a mortgage, deed of trust, or
security agreement.
(3)  A transfer is made for present value if the exchange between the debtor
and the transferee is intended by them to be contemporaneous and is in fact
substantially contemporaneous.
